North Carolina statutes. Chapter 148. State Prison System.
Article 1. Organization and Management.
§ 148-10.2.
Policy: Certain inmates not to contact family members of victims. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

It shall be the policy of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety to prohibit death row inmates from contacting the surviving family members of the victims without the written consent of the family members being contacted. For purposes of this subsection, the term “contact” includes arranging for a third party to forward communications from the inmate to the surviving family members of the victim.

At the request of the victim or a family member of the victim, the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall prohibit an inmate convicted of an offense listed in G.S. 15A-830(a)(7) from contacting the requesting party. For purposes of this subsection, the term “contact” includes arranging for a third party to forward communications from the inmate to the victim or family member.

The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall develop and impose sanctions against any inmate who violates the provisions of this section.

History.

1999-358, s. 1; 2001-433, s. 9; 2001-487, s. 120; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(aaaaaaa).

§ 148-10.2.
Policy: Certain inmates not to contact family members of victims. [Effective January 1, 2023]

It shall be the policy of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction to prohibit death row inmates from contacting the surviving family members of the victims without the written consent of the family members being contacted. For purposes of this subsection, the term “contact” includes arranging for a third party to forward communications from the inmate to the surviving family members of the victim.

At the request of the victim or a family member of the victim, the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall prohibit an inmate convicted of an offense listed in G.S. 15A-830(a)(7) from contacting the requesting party. For purposes of this subsection, the term “contact” includes arranging for a third party to forward communications from the inmate to the victim or family member.

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall develop and impose sanctions against any inmate who violates the provisions of this section.

History.

1999-358, s. 1; 2001-433, s. 9; 2001-487, s. 120; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(aaaaaaa); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

§ 148-10.3.
Electronic monitoring costs. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Personnel, equipment, and other costs of providing electronic monitoring of pretrial or sentenced offenders shall be reimbursed to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety by the State or local agency requesting the service in an amount not exceeding the actual costs.

History.

2002-126, s. 17.10(a); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(bbbbbbb).

§ 148-10.3.
Electronic monitoring costs. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Personnel, equipment, and other costs of providing electronic monitoring of pretrial or sentenced offenders shall be reimbursed to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction by the State or local agency requesting the service in an amount not exceeding the actual costs.

History.

2002-126, s. 17.10(a); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(bbbbbbb); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

§ 148-10.4.
Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Fund. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Definitions. — The following definitions apply in this section:

Division. — Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety.

Fund. — The Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Fund established by this section.

Program. — Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program established under G.S. 148-32.1(b3) [G.S. 148-32.1(b2)].

Sheriffs’ Association. — North Carolina Sheriffs’ Association, Inc.

Intent and Purpose. — It is the intent of the General Assembly that the funds in the Fund established by this section be used to reimburse local governments for expenses incurred for housing misdemeanants under the Program, and other related expenses; and to cover administrative costs incurred by the Sheriffs’ Association for services provided by it regarding the housing of these misdemeanants.

Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Fund established. — There is created within the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice a special nonreverting fund called the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Fund.

Fund Uses. — Moneys in the Fund may be used for the following:

Reimbursements by the Sheriffs’ Association to counties for the costs of housing misdemeanants under the Program, including the care, supervision, and transportation of those misdemeanants.

Reimbursements to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice for the cost of housing misdemeanants transferred to the Division pursuant to G.S. 148-32.1(b3), including the care, supervision, and transportation of those misdemeanants.

To pay the Sheriffs’ Association for administrative and operating expenses pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.

To pay the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice for administrative and operating expenses pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-94, s. 17C.1(b), effective July 1, 2016.

Upon notification from the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice that an amount owed by a county for safekeeper reimbursements authorized under

G.S. 162-39

is more than 120 days overdue, the Sheriffs’ Association shall withhold funds from any reimbursements due to a county under this section and transmit those funds to the Division until that overdue safekeeper reimbursement is satisfied.

History.

2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2011-192, s. 7(h); 2013-360, s. 16C.6(a); 2015-241, ss. 16C.6(c), 16C.12; 2016-94, s. 17C.1(b); 2017-186, ss. 2(ccccccc), 3(a).

§ 148-10.4.
Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Fund. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Definitions. — The following definitions apply in this section:

Division. — Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction.

Fund. — The Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Fund established by this section.

Program. — Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program established under G.S. 148-32.1(b3) [G.S. 148-32.1(b2)].

Sheriffs’ Association. — North Carolina Sheriffs’ Association, Inc.

Intent and Purpose. — It is the intent of the General Assembly that the funds in the Fund established by this section be used to reimburse local governments for expenses incurred for housing misdemeanants under the Program, and other related expenses; and to cover administrative costs incurred by the Sheriffs’ Association for services provided by it regarding the housing of these misdemeanants.

Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Fund established. — There is created within the Division of Prisons a special nonreverting fund called the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Fund.

Fund Uses. — Moneys in the Fund may be used for the following:

Reimbursements by the Sheriffs’ Association to counties for the costs of housing misdemeanants under the Program, including the care, supervision, and transportation of those misdemeanants.

Reimbursements to the Division of Prisons for the cost of housing misdemeanants transferred to the Division pursuant to G.S. 148-32.1(b3), including the care, supervision, and transportation of those misdemeanants.

To pay the Sheriffs’ Association for administrative and operating expenses pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.

To pay the Division of Prisons for administrative and operating expenses pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-94, s. 17C.1(b), effective July 1, 2016.

Upon notification from the Division of Prisons that an amount owed by a county for safekeeper reimbursements authorized under

G.S. 162-39

is more than 120 days overdue, the Sheriffs’ Association shall withhold funds from any reimbursements due to a county under this section and transmit those funds to the Division until that overdue safekeeper reimbursement is satisfied.

History.

2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2011-192, s. 7(h); 2013-360, s. 16C.6(a); 2015-241, ss. 16C.6(c), 16C.12; 2016-94, s. 17C.1(b); 2017-186, ss. 2(ccccccc), 3(a); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), (q).

§ 148-10.5.
Facilitation of reentry. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

In order to facilitate successful reentry and improve judicial efficiency, the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall work with law enforcement, the district attorneys’ offices, and the courts to develop a process by which, both at intake and before release, effort is made, for each inmate in custody, to identify all outstanding warrants on the inmate. The plan should seek to resolve inmates’ outstanding warrants while in custody, whenever feasible. In the course of resolving an outstanding warrant while in custody, an inmate shall be notified of the outstanding warrant and his or her right to counsel if such a right exists.

History.

2015-48, s. 2; 2017-186, s. 2(ddddddd).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(ddddddd), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the first sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-10.5.
Facilitation of reentry. [Effective January 1, 2023]

In order to facilitate successful reentry and improve judicial efficiency, the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall work with law enforcement, the district attorneys’ offices, and the courts to develop a process by which, both at intake and before release, effort is made, for each inmate in custody, to identify all outstanding warrants on the inmate. The plan should seek to resolve inmates’ outstanding warrants while in custody, whenever feasible. In the course of resolving an outstanding warrant while in custody, an inmate shall be notified of the outstanding warrant and his or her right to counsel if such a right exists.

History.

2015-48, s. 2; 2017-186, s. 2(ddddddd); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(ddddddd), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the first sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.